Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-2128
Merger; acquisition; exempt transactions.

Section 44-2126 shall not apply to:

(1) Any transaction which is subject to the provisions of the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act and
sections 44-224.01 to 44-224.10, except as otherwise provided in Chapter 44,
dealing with the merger or consolidation of two or more insurers; or

(2) Any offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition which
the director by order shall exempt therefrom as (a) not having been made or
entered into for the purpose and not having the effect of changing or influencing
the control of a domestic insurer or (b) otherwise not comprehended within
the purposes of section 44-2126.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 9;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 221;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 287.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.